California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.2.

The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.3.

(a) As used in this chapter, “person” includes any individual, firm, company, limited liability company, association, organization, partnership, and corporation.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 7.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.3.

(a) As used in this chapter, “person” includes any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, and corporation.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 19) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 8.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.4.

As used in this chapter, “bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.5.

As used in this chapter, “chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.6.

As used in this chapter, “licensee” means a person licensed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.7.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(1) “Qualified manager” means the individual under whose direction, control, charge, or management the business of a licensee is operated as specified in Section 7536, and who is in possession of a current and valid qualified manager’s certificate issued pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The holder of a qualified manager license is an individual who has applied for and received a qualified manager license, as provided in Section 7525.2, and is eligible to be associated with more than one private investigator license pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7536.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.10.

As used in this chapter, “employer” means a person who employs an individual for wages or salary, lists the individual on the employer’s payroll records, and withholds all legally required deductions and contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.11.

As used in this chapter, “employee” means an individual who works for an employer, is listed on the employer’s payroll records, and is under the employer’s direction and control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.12.

As used in this chapter, “employer-employee” relationship means a relationship in which an individual works for another, the individual’s name appears on the payroll records of the employer, and the employee is under the direction and control of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.13.

As used in this chapter, “firearm permit” includes “firearms permit,” “firearms qualification card,” “firearms qualification,” and “firearms qualification permit.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.14.

(a) As used in this chapter, “member” means an individual who is a member of a limited liability company as specified in Section 17704.01 of the Corporations Code.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 9.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.15.

(a) As used in this chapter, “manager” means an individual designated under an operating agreement of a manager-managed limited liability company who is responsible for performing the management functions for the limited liability company specified in subdivision (c) of Section 17704.07 of the Corporations Code.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 10.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7513.

Every power and duty granted to or imposed upon the director may be exercised by any other officer or employee of the Department of Consumer Affairs authorized by the director, but the director shall have the supervision of and the responsibility for all powers and duties exercised by these officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7513.5.

The director may, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act and subject to the provisions of Section 159.5, appoint and fix the compensation of inspectors, investigators, and other personnel as may be necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7514.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as entitling any person to practice law in this state unless he or she is an active member of the State Bar of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [7515. - 7519.4.]

7515.

The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules, as follows:

(a) Fixing the qualifications of licensees and qualified managers, in addition to those prescribed in this chapter, necessary to promote and protect the public welfare.

(b) Carrying out generally the provisions of this chapter, including regulation of the conduct of licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 6.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7518.

Where a hearing is held under this chapter to determine whether an application for a license should be granted or to determine the qualifications of a licensee’s qualified manager, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 7.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7519.

The director shall furnish, at least once every two years, one copy of the current licensing law, rules, and regulations to every licensed business governed under this chapter, without charge. The director may charge and collect a fee equivalent to the cost of producing these documents for each additional copy which may be furnished upon request to any licensee or any applicant for licensure and for each copy furnished on request to any other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7519.1.

(a) The Governor shall appoint a Private Investigator Disciplinary Review Committee, and may remove any member of the committee for misconduct, incompetency, or neglect of duty. 

(b) The committee shall consist of three members actively engaged in the business of a licensed private investigator and two public members. The public members shall not be licensees or registrants, or engage in any business or profession in which any part of the fees, compensation, or revenue thereof, is derived from any licensee. 

(c) The committee shall meet every 60 days or more or less frequently as may be required. The members
 shall be paid per diem pursuant to Section 103 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses. The members shall be appointed for a term of four years.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   (AB 921)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7519.2.

(a) The Private Investigator Disciplinary Review Committee shall perform the following functions:

(1) Affirm, rescind, or modify all decisions concerning administrative fines assessed by the bureau against private investigators that are appealed to the committee.

(2) Affirm, rescind, or modify all
 decisions concerning denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses or permits issued by the bureau, except denials, suspensions, or revocations ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that are appealed to the committee.

(b) The committee may grant a probationary
 license with respect to the appealed decisions described in subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 635, Sec. 2.   (AB 921)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7519.3.

(a) (1) A person licensed with the department under this chapter may appeal the assessment of an administrative fine to the Private Investigator Disciplinary Review Committee. A person denied, suspended of, or revoked of a license under this chapter may appeal to the committee, unless the denial, suspension, or revocation of the license is ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) A request for an appeal to the committee shall be made in a written notice to the department within 30 days of the assessment of an administrative fine or denial,
 suspension, or revocation of a license.

(3) Following review by the committee of the appeal, the appellant shall be notified in writing, by regular mail, within 30 days of the committee’s decision on the appeal.

(4) If the appellant disagrees with the decision made by the committee, the appellant may request a hearing as described in subdivision (b). A request for a hearing following a decision by the committee shall be made by written notice to the department within 30 days following notice of the committee’s decision.

(5) If the appellant does not request a hearing within those 30 days, the committee’s decision shall become final.

(b) (1) A person licensed with the department under this chapter may request a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if he or she contests an assessment of an administrative fine, or to appeal a denial, suspension, or revocation of a license. A hearing may also be requested, if the appellant disagrees with the decision made by the committee.

(2) A request for a hearing shall be made by written notice to the department within 30 days following the issuance of the decision by the committee. A hearing pursuant to this subdivision shall be available only after a review by the committee.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 635, Sec. 3.   (AB 921)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7519.4.

(a) The Private Investigator Disciplinary Review Committee shall be provided all evidence used by the bureau in reaching its decision prior to hearing an appeal.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 635, Sec. 4.   (AB 921)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulation, Licensing, and Registration [7520. - 7539.]

7520.

No person shall engage in a business regulated by this chapter; act or assume to act as, or represent himself or herself to be, a licensee unless he or she is licensed under this chapter; and no person shall falsely represent that he or she is employed by a licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7520.3.

(a) As a condition of the issuance, reinstatement, reactivation, or continued valid use of a license under this chapter, a limited liability company shall, in accordance with this section, maintain a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims based upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of the private investigator services it provides.

(b) The total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance required under this section shall be as follows:

(1) For a limited liability company licensee with five or fewer persons named as members pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 7525.1, the aggregate limit
 shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(2) For a limited liability company licensee with more than five persons named as members pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 7525.1, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of insurance shall be obtained for each person named as members of the licensee except that the maximum amount of insurance is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in any one designated period, less amounts paid in defending, settling, or discharging claims as set forth under this section.

(c) Prior to the issuance, reinstatement, or reactivation of a limited liability company license as provided under this chapter, the applicant or licensee shall, in the manner prescribed by the bureau, submit the information and documentation required by this section and requested by the bureau, demonstrating compliance with the
 financial security requirements specified by this section.

(d) For any insurance policy secured by a licensee in satisfaction of this section, a Certificate of Liability Insurance, signed by an authorized agent or employee of the insurer, shall be submitted electronically or otherwise to the bureau. The insurer issuing the certificate shall report to the bureau the following information for any policy required under this section: name, license number, policy number, dates that coverage is scheduled to commence and lapse, and cancellation date if applicable. The insurer shall list the bureau as the certificate holder for the purposes of receiving notifications related to the policy’s status.

(e) (1) If a licensee fails to maintain sufficient insurance as required by this section, or fails to provide proof of the required insurance upon request by the bureau,
 the license is subject to suspension and shall be automatically suspended pursuant to this subdivision until the date that the licensee provides proof to the bureau of compliance with the insurance coverage requirement.

(2) Prior to an automatic suspension, the bureau shall notify the licensee, in writing, that it has 30 days to provide proof to the bureau of having the required insurance or the license shall be automatically suspended.

(3) If the licensee fails to provide proof of insurance coverage within this period, the bureau may automatically suspend the license.

(f) If the license of a limited liability company is suspended pursuant to subdivision (e), each member of the limited liability company shall be personally liable up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) each for damages resulting to third parties in
 connection with the company’s performance, during the period of suspension, of any act or contract when a license is required by this chapter.

(g) A licensee organized as a limited liability company shall report annually to the bureau the date and amount of any claims paid during the prior calendar year from any general liability insurance policy held pursuant to this section. The licensee shall report the information on a form provided by the bureau. The licensee shall report the claim information no later than March 1. The creation of the form shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 11.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7520.5.

The director may authorize a licensed private investigator from another state to continue in this state for 60 days an investigation that originated in the state which is the location of the private investigator’s principal place of business if that state provides reciprocal authority for California’s licensees. The private investigator shall notify the department in writing upon entering the state for the purpose of continuing an investigation and shall be subject to all provisions of this chapter. For purposes of this section, “originated” means investigatory activities conducted subsequent to an agreement to conduct an investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 216, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7521.

A private investigator within the meaning of this chapter is a person, other than an insurance adjuster subject to the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 5 of the Insurance Code, who, for any consideration whatsoever engages in business or accepts employment to furnish or agrees to furnish any person to protect persons pursuant to Section 7521.5, or engages in business or accepts employment to furnish, or agrees to make, or makes, any investigation for the purpose of obtaining, information with reference to:

(a) Crime or wrongs done or threatened against the United States of America or any state or territory of the United States of America.

(b) The identity, habits, conduct, business,
 occupation, honesty, integrity, credibility, knowledge, trustworthiness, efficiency, loyalty, activity, movement, whereabouts, affiliations, associations, transactions, acts, reputation, or character of any person.

(c) The location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property.

(d) The cause or responsibility for fires, libels, losses, accidents, or damage or injury to persons or to property.

(e) Securing evidence to be used before any court, board, officer, or investigating committee.

For the purposes of this section, a private investigator is any person, as defined in Section 7512.3, acting for the purpose of investigating, obtaining, and reporting to any employer, or an agent designated by the employer, information concerning the employer’s employees involving
 questions of integrity, honesty, breach of rules, or other standards of performance of job duties.

This section does not apply to a public utility regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, or its employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 6.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7521.5.

(a) A private investigator may provide services to protect a person, but not property, which is incidental to an investigation for which the private investigator has been previously hired to perform.

(b) If the private investigator provides those services, he or she shall comply with the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 7540), as those provisions relate to the carrying of firearms and the receipt of a valid firearms qualification card from the bureau.

(c) If the private investigator provides those services, he or she shall comply with the requirements of Sections
 7583.39, 7583.40, and 7583.41, as those provisions relate to the maintenance of an insurance policy.

(d) If a person acts for, or on behalf of a private investigator in providing those services, that person shall be an employee of the private investigator, as defined by Section 7512.11, and there shall be an employer-employee relationship, as defined in Section 7512.12, and that person shall comply with the requirements of this section, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 10.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7522.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) A person employed exclusively and regularly by any employer who does not provide contract security services for other entities or persons, in connection with the affairs of that employer only and where there exists an employer-employee relationship if that person at no time carries or uses any deadly weapon in the performance of that person’s duties. For purposes of this subdivision, “deadly weapon” is defined to include any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, any dirk, dagger, pistol, revolver, or any other firearm, any knife having a blade longer than five inches, any razor with an unguarded blade and any metal pipe or bar used or intended to be used as a club.

(b) An officer or employee of the United States, or of this state or a political subdivision thereof, while the officer or employee is engaged in the performance of that officer’s or employee’s official duties, including uniformed peace officers employed part time by a public agency pursuant to a written agreement between a chief of police or sheriff and the public agency, provided the part-time employment does not exceed 50 hours in any calendar month.

(c) A person engaged exclusively in the business of obtaining and furnishing information as to the financial rating of persons.

(d) A charitable philanthropic society or association duly incorporated under the laws of this state which is organized and maintained for the public good and not for private profit.

(e) An attorney at law in performing the attorney’s duties as an attorney at law.

(f) Admitted insurers and agents and insurance brokers licensed by the state, performing duties in connection with insurance transacted by them.

(g) Any bank subject to the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under Division 1 (commencing with Section 99) of the Financial Code or the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States.

(h) A person engaged solely in the business of securing information about persons or property from public records.

(i) A peace officer of this state or a political subdivision thereof while the peace officer is employed by a private employer to engage in off-duty employment in accordance with
 Section 1126 of the Government Code. However, nothing herein shall exempt a peace officer who either contracts for the peace officer’s services or the services of others as a private investigator or contracts for the peace officer’s services as or is employed as an armed private investigator. For purposes of this subdivision, “armed private investigator” means an individual who carries or uses a firearm in the course and scope of that contract or employment.

(j) A licensed insurance adjuster in performing the adjuster’s duties within the scope of the adjuster’s license as an insurance adjuster.

(k) Any savings association subject to the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or the Comptroller of the Currency.

(l) Any secured creditor engaged in the repossession of the
 creditor’s collateral and any lessor engaged in the repossession of leased property in which it claims an interest.

(m) The act of serving process by an individual who is registered as a process server pursuant to Section 22350.

(n) (1) A person or business engaged in conducting objective observations of consumer purchases of products or services in the public environments of a business establishment by the use of a preestablished questionnaire, provided that person or business entity does not engage in any other activity that requires licensure pursuant to this chapter. The questionnaire may include objective comments.

(2) If a preestablished questionnaire is used as a basis, but not the sole basis, for disciplining or discharging an employee, or for conducting an interview with the employee
 that might result in the employee being terminated, the employer shall provide the employee with a copy of that questionnaire using the same procedures that an employer is required to follow under Section 2930 of the Labor Code for providing an employee with a copy of a shopping investigator’s report. This subdivision does not exempt from this chapter a person or business described in paragraph (1) if a preestablished questionnaire of that person or business is used as the sole basis for evaluating an employee’s work performance.

(o) Any joint labor-management committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (Section 175a of Title 29 of the United States Code), or its employees, where either the committee or employee is performing a function authorized by the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978, which includes, but is not limited to, monitoring public works projects to ensure that employers are
 complying with federal and state public works laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 4.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7523.

(a) Unless specifically exempted by Section 7522, no person shall engage in the business of private investigator, as defined in Section 7521, unless that person has applied for and received a license to engage in that business pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or who conspires with another person to violate any provision of this chapter, relating to private investigator licensure, or who knowingly engages a nonexempt unlicensed person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (b) may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought
 by the Attorney General, all of the penalties collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(d) Any person who: (1) acts as or represents themselves to be a private investigator licensee under this chapter when they are not a licensee under this chapter; (2) falsely represents that they are employed by a licensee under this chapter when they are not employed by a licensee under this chapter; (3) carries a badge, identification card, or business card, indicating that they are a licensee under this chapter when they are not a licensee under this chapter; (4) uses a letterhead or other written or electronically generated materials indicating that they are a licensee under this chapter when they are not a licensee under this chapter; or (5) advertises that they are a licensee under this chapter when they are not a
 licensee, is guilty of a misdemeanor that is punishable by a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (d) may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor,
 one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(f) Any person who is convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section shall not be issued a license under this chapter, within one year following that conviction.

(g) Any person who is convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), (b), or (d) shall not be issued a license for a period of one year following a first conviction and shall not be issued a license for a period of five years following a second or subsequent conviction of subdivision (a),
 (b), or (d), or any combination of subdivision (a), (b), or (d).

(h) The chief shall gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any rule or regulation established pursuant to this chapter by persons engaged in the business of private investigator who fail to obtain a license and shall gather evidence of violations and furnish that evidence to prosecuting officers of any county or city for the purpose of prosecuting all violations occurring within their jurisdiction.

(i) The prosecuting officer of any county or city shall prosecute all violations of this chapter occurring within their jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 41.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7523.5.

(a) The superior court in and for the county wherein any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act which constitutes a violation of Section 7523 may, upon a petition filed by the bureau with the approval of the director, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining this conduct and may impose civil fines not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that there shall be no requirement to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or irreparable injury.

(b) The superior court for the county in which any person
 has engaged in any act which constitutes a violation of Section 7523 may, upon a petition filed by the bureau with the approval of the director, order this person to make restitution to persons injured as a result of the violation.

(c) The court may order a person subject to an injunction or restraining order, provided for in subdivision (a), or subject to an order requiring restitution pursuant to subdivision (b), to reimburse the bureau for expenses incurred by the bureau in its investigation related to its petition.

(d) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (a) and enjoin the unlicensed operation may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and
 county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(e) The remedy provided for by this section shall be in addition to any other remedy provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 8.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7524.

(a) Every agreement to provide a service regulated by this chapter, including, but not limited to, contract agreements and investigative agreements, shall be in writing. An initial client service agreement shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The licensed private investigator’s name, business address, business telephone number, and license number.

(2) A disclosure that private investigators are licensed and regulated by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services within the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(3) Approximate start and
 completion dates of the work to be provided. A master agreement for frequently contracted services over a specified period of time shall be exempt from meeting this requirement if the agreement includes the beginning and termination dates.

(4) A description of the scope of the investigation or services to be provided. An agreement shall indicate whether or not a written report is to be provided to the client and the agreed upon method of delivery of that written report, as applicable.

(5) All labor, services, and materials to be provided for the scope of work conducted by the private investigator.

(6) An explanation of the fees agreed upon by the parties, including a breakdown of how the fees are assessed by the
 licensee.

(7) Any other matters agreed upon by the parties.

(b) Any amendment, addendum, or other modification to an initial client service agreement shall be in writing and is subject to the requirements of this section. An amendment, addendum, or other modification shall include a description of the changes to the scope of work, start and completion dates, method of delivery, fees to be charged, and other matters agreed upon in the initial client service agreement, as applicable.

(c) (1) The initial client service agreement and any amendment, addendum, or other modification to the agreement shall be legible and clearly indicate any other document incorporated into it.

(2) Before any work commences, the client shall receive a signed copy of the written initial client service agreement and any amendment, addendum, or other modification to the agreement that was agreed to before commencement of the work.

(3) Services detailed under the scope of work shall not be performed and charges shall not accrue before written authorization to proceed is obtained from the client.

(d) Upon completion of the investigation, any written report, as agreed upon by all parties and indicated in the agreement, shall be provided to the client within 30 days from the completion date and in accordance with the agreed upon delivery method.

(e) The licensee
 shall maintain a legible copy of the signed agreement and investigative findings, including any written report, for a minimum of two years. These records shall be made available for inspection by the bureau upon demand. Making these records available for inspection by the bureau shall not violate, waive, or extinguish the lawyer-client privilege under Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the attorney work product doctrine as restated in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2018.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the duty to maintain the confidence and preserve the secrets of an attorney’s client under subdivision (e) of Section 6068, or the protections of any other rule or law related to attorney work product or the attorney-client privilege.

(f) This section shall
 become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 232, Sec. 7.   (SB 1311)   Effective September 14, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7525.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be on a form prescribed by the director and accompanied by the application fee provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7525.1.

An application shall be verified and shall include:

(a) The full name and business address of the applicant.

(b) The name under which the applicant intends to do business.

(c) A statement as to the general nature of the business in which the applicant intends to engage.

(d) A verified statement of their experience qualifications.

(e) (1) If the applicant is an individual, a qualified manager, a partner of a partnership, an officer of a corporation designated in subdivision (h), or a member, officer, or manager
 of a limited liability company designated in subdivision (i), one personal identification form provided by the bureau upon which shall appear a photograph taken within one year immediately preceding the date of the filing of the application together with two legible sets of fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, on a form approved by the Department of Justice, and a personal description of each person, respectively. The identification form shall include residence addresses and employment history for the previous five years and be signed under penalty of perjury.

(2) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.
